Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-1219
Board; meetings; quorum.

(1) Special meetings of the board shall be called upon the written request of any three members of the board. The place of all meetings shall be at the offices of the department, unless otherwise determined by the board.

(2) A majority of the members of the board shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business. Every act of a majority of the total number of members of the board shall be deemed to be an act of the board.

Laws 1986, LB 310, § 19;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1157.